Illinois, session 104th, HB25.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Governmental and Governmental 5Employees Tort Immunity Act is amended by adding Sections 61-211 and 2-215 as follows: 7    (745 ILCS 10/1-211 new)8    Sec. 1-211. "Administrative law judge" means an employee 9or independent contractor employed by a local public entity 10who serves in a quasi-judicial function regardless of the 11employee's or independent contractor's title. 12    (745 ILCS 10/2-215 new)13    Sec. 2-215. Administrative law judges. An administrative 14law judge is not liable for an injury that allegedly is caused 15by any decision made by the administrative law judge as part of 16the administrative law judge's quasi-judicial duties.